Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1521, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 460, O.S.L. 2025 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1521), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1521. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury


a fund to be known as the “Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver


Safety Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to


fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all appropriations and


transfers made by the Legislature. All monies accruing to the


credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and


expended by the Department of Transportation for the purposes

Req. No. 2976 Page 1


authorized by subsection D of this section in amounts as authorized


by the Oklahoma Legislature. Expenditures from the fund shall be


made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims


filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. Beginning July 1, 2021, except for an amount equivalent to


the amount of revenue apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access


and Driver Safety Fund pursuant to Section 500.4B of Title 68 and


Section 1104 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes and from other


sources apportioned to the Fund fund by law, there shall be


apportioned to the funds specified in this subsection from the


monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue


Fund by Section 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes from the


revenues derived pursuant to subsections A, B and E of Section 2355


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes amounts as follows:


1. Subject to any reductions required by subsection C of this


section, there shall be apportioned to the Rebuilding Oklahoma


Access and Driver Safety Fund:


a. for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021, and for


each fiscal year thereafter, Eighty Million Dollars


($80,000,000.00), which shall be allocated and used by


the Department of Transportation first for the purpose


of making any required payments for principal,


interest or other costs of borrowing with respect to

Req. No. 2976 Page 2


the obligations issued pursuant to Section 341 of


Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and after any such


required payment has been made then for the purposes


otherwise authorized by this section, plus


b. the total amount apportioned to the Rebuilding


Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for the


preceding fiscal year which, except for the amount


prescribed by subparagraph a of this paragraph, shall


be apportioned before any other amount is apportioned


pursuant to Section 2352 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, plus


c. an additional amount that is required in order for the


total apportionment to the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access


and Driver Safety Fund from all sources for such


fiscal year to equal:


(1) Five Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars


($575,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2021,


(2) Five Hundred Ninety Million Dollars


($590,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2022, and


(3) Six Hundred Ten Million Dollars ($610,000,000.00)


for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025,



Req. No. 2976 Page 3


(4) Six Hundred Forty Million Dollars


($640,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2026,


(5) Six Hundred Ninety Million Dollars


($690,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2027,


(6) Seven Hundred Forty Million Dollars


($740,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2028,


(7) Seven Hundred Ninety Million Dollars


($790,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2029,


(8) Eight Hundred Forty Million Dollars


($840,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2030,


(9) Eight Hundred Ninety Million Dollars


($890,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2031,


(10) Nine Hundred Forty Million Dollars


($940,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2032,


(11) Nine Hundred Ninety Million Dollars


($990,000,000.00) for the fiscal year beginning


July 1, 2033, and

Req. No. 2976 Page 4


(12) One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) for the


fiscal year beginning July 1, 2034, and for each


fiscal year thereafter.


All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be


divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month


during the fiscal year except the amount specified in subparagraph a


of this paragraph which amount shall be allocated in its full amount


in cash not later than July 30 each year or such later date as may


be required in order for the amount to be allocated in cash; and


2. For each fiscal year after the apportionments required by


paragraph 1 of this subsection have been made:


a. the next Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be


apportioned to the Oklahoma Tourism and Passenger Rail


Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 325 of


Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes to be used for


capital and operating costs for the “Heartland Flyer”


rail project, and


b. the next Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall


be apportioned to the Public Transit Revolving Fund


created pursuant to Section 4031 of this title to be


used for purposes authorized by law other than the


purpose described by subparagraph a of this paragraph.





Req. No. 2976 Page 5


All amounts apportioned pursuant to this paragraph shall be


divided into twelve equal amounts to be apportioned each month


during the fiscal year.


C. In the event that the Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services declares a General Revenue Fund revenue


failure pursuant to Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and agency allocations are reduced pursuant to the


provisions of Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


the amounts that would otherwise be apportioned to the ROADS


Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund by:


1. Subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this


section, only to the extent that the amount is not required for debt


service related to the obligations authorized pursuant to Section


341 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of


the Oklahoma Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896


of the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;


2. Subparagraphs b and c of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this


section; and


3. Subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this


section,


shall be reduced by a percentage equal to that required of the


General Revenue Fund appropriations to state agencies and such


reductions shall occur during the entire fiscal year and for any


month during which such reductions are required by the Office of

Req. No. 2976 Page 6


Management and Enterprise Services and by the same percentage as


that required of the agencies for such General Revenue Fund


appropriations.


D. The Department of Transportation shall use the monies in the


Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund for:


1. The construction and maintenance of state roads, bridges and


highways;


2. The direct expenses of operating and maintaining the state


highway system, including bridges;


3. Direct expenses incurred in constructing, repairing, and


maintaining state highways, farm-to-market roads, county highways


and bridges as authorized by law;


4. Matching federal funds;


5. The purchase of materials, tools, machinery, motor vehicles,


and equipment necessary or convenient for the construction and


maintenance of the state highway system and bridges;


6. Debt service incurred prior to January 1, 2006, for Capital


Improvement Program bonds sold pursuant to Section 2001 of this


title;


7. Debt service incurred on or after July 1, 2009, with respect


to obligations authorized to be issued pursuant to Section 341 of


Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the


Oklahoma Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of


the 1st Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature; and

Req. No. 2976 Page 7


8. For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, and


ending on or prior to June 30, 2033, Twenty Million Dollars


($20,000,000.00) per fiscal year for the construction, repair, and


maintenance of weigh stations on the state highway system.


E. From the monies allocated pursuant to the provisions of


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section each


fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall make payments


required for the payment of principal, interest and other costs


related to the obligations issued by the Oklahoma Capitol


Improvement Authority as authorized by Section 341 of Title 73 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 350 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 2896 of the 1st


Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, and such payments shall be


made by the Department each fiscal year before such monies are used


for any other purpose.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2976 CJD 12/30/2025 11:05:36 AM





Req. No. 2976 Page 8